Louisiana, session 2026, HB1093.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:259(A)(25) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§259. Transfer of agencies and functions to Louisiana Department of Health
A. The following agencies are transferred to and hereafter shall be within the
Louisiana Department of Health as provided in R.S. 36:803:
* * *
(25) The Louisiana Naturopathic Medicine Examining Board (R.S. 37:3731
et seq.).
* * *
Section 2. Chapter 62 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 37:3731 through 3744, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
CHAPTER 62. NATUROPATHIC DOCTORS
§3731. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Naturopathic
Doctor's Practice Act".
§3732. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Section:
(1) "Biological product" means any of the following that is applicable to the
prevention, treatment, or cure of a disease or condition of human beings:
(a) A virus.
(b) A therapeutic serum.
(c) A toxin.
(d) An antitoxin.
(e) A vaccine.
(f) Blood.
(g) A blood component or derivative.
(h) An allergenic product.
(i) A protein.
(j) A product that is analogous to any of the products listed in Subparagraphs
(a) through (i) of this Paragraph.
(2) "Board" means the Louisiana Naturopathic Medicine Board.
(3) "Clinical laboratory procedure" means any of the following when
performed for diagnostic purposes:
(a) The ordering, performing, and interpretation of laboratory examinations
consistent with the practice of naturopathic medicine.
(b) Recording of a patient's health history and the performance of physical
examinations, including speculum examinations and the examination of body
orifices.
Page 2 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(c) Ordering and interpretation of diagnostic imaging studies and commonly
used diagnostic modalities, including but not limited to x-ray, ultrasound,
mammogram, bone densitometry, computed tomography, and magnetic resonance
imaging.
(d) Obtaining samples of human tissues and fluids if surgical excision is
limited to what is authorized as a minor office procedure.
(e) Clinical laboratory procedures does not include endoscopies,
colonoscopies, or any surgical excision beyond the definition of a minor office
procedure.
(4)(a) "Compounding" means the combining of components into a
compounded preparation in either of the following conditions:
(i) As the result of a practitioner's prescription drug order or initiative based
on the practitioner-patient-pharmacist relationship in the course of professional
practice to meet the specialized medical need of an individual patient of the
practitioner that cannot be filled by a drug approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration.
(ii) For the purpose of, or incidental to, research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale or dispensing.
(b) Compounding includes the preparation of drugs, nutrients, or devices in
anticipation of receiving prescriptive drug orders based on routine, regularly
observed prescribing patterns.
(c) Compounding does not include reconstituting any mixed drug according
to the United States Food and Drug Administration-approved labeling of the drug.
(5) "Controlled substance" means a controlled dangerous substance
enumerated in Schedules I through V in accordance with R.S. 40:961 et seq. with the
exclusion of testosterone.
(6) "Device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine,
contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or related article, including a
component part or accessory that is any of the following:
Page 3 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(a) Recognized in the official national formulary, or the United States
pharmacopoeia, or any supplement thereof.
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions.
(c) Used for the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
humans or other animals.
(d) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of human or
other animals.
(e) Does not achieve its primary intended purposes through chemical action
within or on the body of humans or other animals.
(f) Not dependent upon being metabolized for the achievement of any of its
primary intended purposes.
(7) "Dispense" or "dispensing" means to deliver prescription medication to
the ultimate user or research subject to or pursuant to the lawful order of a
practitioner or pursuant to the prescription of mid-level practitioner, including but
not limited to delivering prescription medication to a patient by mail, common
carrier, personal delivery, or third-party delivery to any location requested by the
patient.
(8) "Drug" means any of the following:
(a) Any substance recognized as a drug in the official compendium, or
supplement thereto, designated by the board for use in the diagnosis, cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of diseases in humans or other animals.
(b) Any substance intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals.
(c) Any substance other than food intended to affect the structure or any
function of the body of humans or other animals.
(9) "Legend drug" means any drug or drug product bearing on the label of
the manufacturer or distributor, as required by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, the statement "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without
prescription".
Page 4 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(10) "Licensee" means a naturopathic doctor licensed by the board in
accordance with this Chapter.
(11)(a) "Minor office procedure" means limited surgical or procedural care
performed in an outpatient clinical setting that satisfies all of the following:
(i) Is confined to superficial tissues and does not involve deeper structures
such as muscles, tendons, nerves, arteries, veins, or internal organs.
(ii) Can be safely performed using local or topical anesthesia only.
(iii) Is commonly performed in an office or outpatient setting and does not
require general anesthesia, sedation requiring anesthetic monitoring, or hospital-level
care.
(b) Minor office procedures may include procedures incidental to the
treatment of superficial wounds, lesions, abrasions, or similar conditions.
(c) Minor office procedures shall be performed only when the procedure is
consistent with the education, training, and demonstrated competency of the
naturopathic doctor.
(12) "Naturopathic medicine" means a system of health care for the
prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of human health conditions, injury, and disease;
the promotion or restoration of health; and the support and stimulation of a patient's
inherent self-healing processes through patient education and the use of naturopathic
therapies and therapeutic substances.
(13) "Naturopathic physical medicine" means the use of physical agents
consistent with naturopathic medical practice, by hand or mechanical means,
including air, water, heat, cold, sound, light, electromagnetism, colon hydrotherapy,
soft tissue therapy, joint mobilization, therapeutic exercise, craniosacral therapy, and
naturopathic manipulation as further defined by board rule.
(14) "Naturopathic therapy" means, including but not limited to the use of
naturopathic physical medicine, suggestion, hygiene, a therapeutic substance, a drug,
nutrition and food science, homeopathic medicine, a clinical laboratory procedure,
or a minor office procedure.
Page 5 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(15) "Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and treatment of
disease or other human conditions through the use of food, water, herbs, roots, bark,
or natural food elements.
(16) "Prescription" means an order from a practitioner authorized by law to
prescribe for a drug or device that is patient-specific and communicated by any
means to a pharmacist in a permitted pharmacy.
(17) "Suggestion" means a technique using any of the following:
(a) Biofeedback.
(b) Quantitative electroencephalography.
(c) Neurofeedback.
(d) Health education.
(e) Health counseling.
(18)(a) "Therapeutic substance" means a natural or pharmaceutical substance
used in the practice of naturopathic medicine for the prevention, diagnosis, or
treatment of disease or the promotion or restoration of health. Therapeutic
substances include but are not limited to all of the following:
(i) A vitamin.
(ii) A mineral.
(iii) A nutriceutical.
(iv) A botanical medicine.
(v) Oxygen.
(vi) Hyperbaric oxygen therapy or HBOT or Mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy
or mHBOT.
(vii) Ozone.
(viii) Homeopathic medicine.
(ix) Hormone or contraceptive device.
(x) A drug.
(xi) Peptide.
(xii) Other physiologic substances.
Page 6 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(b) The use of therapeutic substances are limited to those consistent with the
education and training of the naturopathic doctor.
§3733. The Louisiana Naturopathic Medicine Examining Board
A. The Louisiana Naturopathic Medicine Examining Board is hereby
established within the Louisiana Department of Health.
B. The board consists of the following members:
(1) Four members who are naturopathic doctors from a list of qualified
candidates submitted by the Louisiana Association of Naturopathic Physicians.
(2) One member who is a consumer selected by the governor.
C.(1) The governor shall appoint the members of the board subject to Senate
confirmation.
(2) Each board member who is a naturopathic medical doctor member shall
have at least two years of experience in the practice of naturopathic medicine and
shall be eligible to become licensed in accordance with this Chapter.
(3)(a) The consumer member shall represent consumer interests through
experience in public service, community advocacy, law, or ethics.
(b) The consumer member is ineligible to serve on the board if any of the
following is true:
(i) He has a financial interest in the practice of naturopathic medicine.
(ii) He is the spouse or child of a person practicing naturopathic medicine.
(iii) He is licensed or practicing any healthcare profession.
D.(1) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
(2) All members of the board shall serve terms of three years, except for
initial terms beginning on the effective date of this Chapter and determined by lot at
the first meeting of the board as follows:
(a) One member shall serve until July 1, 2028.
(b) Two members shall serve until July 1, 2029.
(c) Two members shall serve until July 1, 2030.
Page 7 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(3) All members of the board shall serve no more than three consecutive
terms.
E. The board may, by a majority vote, remove a member of the board for
good cause prior to the expiration of the member's term. In the event of death,
resignation, or removal of any board member before the expiration of the term to
which the member was appointed, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired
portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment.
F. The board shall elect a chairperson by a majority vote of the board.
G. The board shall hold a minimum of two meetings per year.
H. The board may appoint such committees as it considers necessary to
carry out its duties.
§3734. Duties and functions of the board
A. The board is the exclusive authority in the state to issue a license to
practice naturopathic medicine. The board shall establish procedures for licensing
qualified naturopathic doctors.
B. The board has the authority to grant, deny, approve, revoke, suspend, or
renew a license to practice naturopathic medicine.
C. The board shall establish procedures for approving naturopathic medicine
educational programs and professional competency examinations to ensure licensees
are qualified to practice naturopathic medicine.
D. The board shall establish standards for continuing education and shall
ensure that licensees meet continuing education requirements prior to renewing a
license to practice naturopathic medicine.
E. The board shall establish ethical and professional standards for the
practice of naturopathic medicine.
F. The board shall have the duty to govern the practice of naturopathic
medicine and accept complaints, conduct investigations, and engage in the discipline
of licensees.
Page 8 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
H. The board shall develop polices and procedures to provide for the
dissemination of information about licensees and lawful practice.
I. The board shall establish the scope of practice authorized by a license to
practice naturopathic medicine in accordance with this Chapter and establish
procedures for the practice of minor procedures and the authority of licensees to
prescribe controlled substances.
J. The board shall develop standards for the supervision of students and other
healthcare professionals.
K. The board shall develop standards for advertising by its licensees.
L. The board may employ an executive director, legal counsel, and hearing
officer as needed to administer the provisions of this Chapter.
M. The board shall promulgate and adopt rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
§3735. Scope of practice
A. A licensee may practice naturopathic medicine within naturopathic
medical education, training, and rules adopted by the board including all of the
following:
(1) Performing physical examinations including speculum examinations and
the examination of body orifices.
(2) Ordering laboratory examinations and diagnostic imaging studies.
(3) Interpreting laboratory examinations for diagnostic purposes.
(4) Ordering diagnostic imaging studies and taking action based on a
radiologist's report in a manner consistent with naturopathic training.
(a) Prescribing, administering, dispensing, and ordering drugs as authorized
by this Chapter.
(b) A licensee may prescribe, administer, dispense, and order therapeutic
substances in accordance with this Chapter and board rule.
(c) After meeting requirements established by the board, including any
pharmacology or pharmacy-related examination requirement, a licensee may
Page 9 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
prescribe and order any controlled substances, excluding controlled dangerous
substances listed in Schedule II of R.S. 40:964, in accordance with federal and state
law.
(d) A licensee may prescribe, recommend, or administer a therapeutic
substance including all of the following:
(i) Food, food extracts, nutraceuticals, vitamins, minerals, amino acids,
enzymes, whole gland thyroid, botanicals, homeopathic preparations, plant
substances, dietary supplements, and nonprescriptive drugs.
(ii) Human cellular and tissue-based products that are not regulated as drugs.
(iii) Healthcare and nutritional counseling, including fertility counseling.
(iv) Dietary therapy, naturopathic physical applications, and barrier
contraceptive devices.
(v) Substances authorized for intradermal, subcutaneous, intramuscular,
intravenous, ligamentous, tendinous, periarticular, intra-vaginal, rectal, or
intra-articular administration, including proliferative therapy.
(vi) Biofeedback and neurofeedback therapies.
(vii) Frequency-based therapies including but not limited to RIFE,
light-based, and soundwave modalities.
(viii) HBOT and mHBOT.
(ix) Durable medical equipment and devices.
(e) A licensee may administer intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous,
intra-articular, and intradermal injections of substances appropriate to naturopathic
medicine and within the licensee's education and training.
(f) A licensee may utilize routes of administration including oral, nasal,
topical, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, intra-articular, intramuscular, transdermal,
intradermal, subcutaneous, ligamentous, tendinous, and intravenous routes, including
proliferative therapy, consistent with education, training, and board rule.
Page 10 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(g) Prescribing, dispensing, and compounding authority exercised pursuant
to this Chapter shall be subject to all applicable provisions of state and federal law
including oversight by the Louisiana Board of Pharmacy.
(7) The use of non-diagnostic ultrasound shall not include the interpretation
of diagnostic imaging studies.
(8) A licensee may provide naturopathic care to a pregnant patient, including
comprehensive prenatal care, wellness care, education, nutritional support, and labor
support services consistent with the licensee's education and training.
(9) A licensee may provide non-medical labor support and adjunctive
therapeutic care during labor and childbirth, if the licensee does not independently
manage labor, perform delivery, or provide services reserved to licensed midwives
or physicians.
(10) A licensee may perform minor office procedures as defined by this
Chapter subject to additional training or examination requirements adopted by rule.
§3736. Requirements for licensure
A. A person shall not engage or attempt to engage in the practice of
naturopathic medicine in this state if he is not licensed in accordance with the
provisions of this Chapter.
B. A license issued by the board is valid for two years from the date of
issuance.
C. The board shall require an applicant for licensure to submit all of the
following:
(1) An application provided by the board.
(2) An application fee and any other fees required by the board.
(3) Evidence of graduation from an approved naturopathic medical
educational program in accordance with this Chapter.
(4) Evidence of passing of a competency-based national naturopathic
medicine licensing examination administered by the North American Board of
Naturopathic Examiners, or an equivalent agency recognized by the board.
Page 11 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
C. If the board determines that an applicant is eligible to be licensed in
accordance with this Chapter and determines that the applicant is physically and
mentally capable of safely practicing naturopathic medicine, the board shall issue the
applicant a license to practice naturopathic medicine.
D. The board shall renew a license to practice naturopathic medicine if the
licensee completes all of the following:
(1) Submits a renewal application provided by the board.
(2) Pays the renewal fee and any other fees required by the board.
(3) Meets continuing education requirements established by the board.
(4) Remains in good standing in accordance with this Chapter and board
rules.
E. The board may deny, suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline a license
in accordance with this Chapter and board rules.
§3737. Educational qualifications; professional competency examination
A. An applicant seeking a license to practice naturopathic medicine shall, at
a minimum, have graduated from either of the following:
(1) A naturopathic medical education program in the United States providing
the degree of Doctor of Naturopathy or Doctor of Naturopathic Medicine, which
offers graduate-level, full-time didactic and supervised clinical training and is
accredited or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation by the Council on
Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally recognized accrediting
body for naturopathic medical programs. A naturopathic medical program shall be
an institution of higher education or part of an institution of higher education that is
either accredited or is a candidate for accreditation by a regional or national
institutional accrediting agency recognized by the United States secretary of
education.
(2) A diploma granting, degree equivalent institution of higher education
located in Canada that has provincial approval for participation in government
funded student aid programs, offers graduate level, full-time didactic and supervised
Page 12 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
clinical training, and is accredited or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation
by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally
recognized accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs recognized by the
board.
B. The board shall require an applicant to provide proof that he has passed
a competency-based national naturopathic medicine licensing examination
administered by the North American Board of Naturopathic Examiners or an
equivalent agency recognized by the board.
§3738. Fees
A. The board shall fix and collect fees that do not exceed the following
amounts for each type of fee and are not refundable:
(1) Application and initial license $500.00
(2) Temporary or provisional license $300.00
(3) License renewal $400.00
(4) License verification $100.00
(5) Duplicate license $100.00
(6) Document certification $ 25.00
(7) Issuance of a subpoena $ 50.00
(8) Probation monitoring $400.00
(9) Delinquent fee, in addition to the renewal fee,
if not renewed by December 31 of
the applicable license period $250.00
B. The board may assess additional fees in conjunction with license renewal
for programs authorized in accordance with this Chapter including but not limited
to professional health monitoring programs or continuing education administration.
C. The board shall not establish or collect any fee in excess of the maximum
amounts provided in this Section unless the increase is authorized by an act of the
legislature.
§3739. Display of qualifications
Page 13 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
A licensee shall display the license issued in accordance with this Chapter
conspicuously at the principal place of practice and shall make available evidence
of completion of an approved naturopathic medical educational program and passage
of an approved professional competency examination.
§3740. Prescriptive authority; requirements
A. A licensee may prescribe and order drugs, including but not limited to
controlled dangerous substances, except a licensee shall not prescribe a drug listed
on Schedule II of the schedules of controlled dangerous substances provided in R.S.
40:964, including an opioid or opioid derivative.
B. A licensee may administer legend drugs and other medication utilizing
routes of administration including but not limited to oral, nasal, topical, auricular,
ocular, rectal, vaginal, intra-articular, intramuscular, transdermal, intradermal,
subcutaneous, ligamentous, tendinous, and intravenous, including proliferative
therapy, consistent within the licensee's scope of practice, education, and training.
C. The board shall require a licensee to do all of the following:
(1) Record each prescription order in writing which may include
electronically recorded and transmitted communication. Each order shall include the
name, address, and telephone number of the naturopathic doctor.
(2) Prescribe only when the naturopathic doctor has adequate education,
training, and experience to safely manage the medical regimen.
(3) Register with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration to
prescribe controlled substances authorized by this Chapter.
(4) Comply with requirements of state and federal law and rules developed
by the board relative to prescribing pharmaceutical drugs.
§3741. Referrals to other providers
A licensee shall refer a patient to a physician or other licensed healthcare
provider authorized to practice in this state if the patient's condition is beyond the
licensee's scope of practice or requires a level of care not authorized by this Chapter.
§3742. Prohibitions; exceptions
Page 14 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
A. A licensee shall not engage in any of the following:
(1) Providing care outside of family practice or primary care as defined by
the board.
(2) Practicing or claiming to practice as a medical doctor, osteopathic
physician, dentist, podiatrist, or any other healthcare professional unless also
licensed as such in this state.
(3) Performing surgery outside the scope of minor office procedures.
(4) Using general or spinal anesthesia.
(5) Administering ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic purposes.
(6) Administering, conducting, or interpreting the results of diagnostic
imaging studies except as authorized by the board.
(7) Performing labor, delivery, or any procedure involving the reproductive
organs of a pregnant patient, or performing operative or invasive obstetrical
procedures.
(8) Prescribing, dispensing, or administering controlled dangerous
substances, except as specifically authorized in accordance with this Chapter.
(9) Performing a surgical procedure using a laser device.
(10) Performing surgical procedures involving the eye, ear, tendon, nerves,
veins, or arteries beyond superficial tissue.
B. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict any of the
following:
(1) The lawful practice of a profession by an individual licensed, certified,
or registered in accordance with state law while acting within his scope of practice.
(2) The practice of naturopathic medicine by a student enrolled in an
approved naturopathic medical educational program, when performed pursuant to
instruction and under the supervision of a licensee or other duly licensed professional
in the instructed field.
(3) Any person selling vitamins, herbs, supplements, or wellness products
from providing general information about such products.
Page 15 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
(4) A practitioner licensed in another jurisdiction from entering this state to
consult with a licensee, limited to consultation, examination, recommendation, or
testimony in litigation.
C.(1) Traditional naturopaths, herbalists, life coaches, nutrition coaches, and
other natural healers who are not licensed in accordance with this Chapter shall not
be prohibited from providing non-medical wellness services, education, coaching,
nutritional guidance, homeopathy, herbal remedies, or other therapies within their
scope of training and practice, if that a person does not do any of the following:
(a) Use a protected licensee title prohibited by this Chapter.
(b) Represent or assume the character or appearance of a licensee.
(c) Use a name, title, credential, abbreviation, or designation that indicates
or implies state licensure as a naturopathic doctor.
(2) A person not licensed in accordance with this Chapter shall use the terms
"traditional naturopath" or "naturopath" if the person complies with the disclosure
requirements of this Chapter and does not imply licensure as a naturopathic doctor.
§3743. Protected titles for licensed naturopathic doctors
A. A licensee shall use the title "Naturopathic Medical Doctor" or
"Naturopathic Doctor" and may use the abbreviations "N.D.", "ND", "NMD", or
"N.M.D.".
B. A licensee has the exclusive right to use any of the following terms:
(1) "Naturopathic doctor".
(2) "Doctor of naturopathic medicine".
(3) "Doctor of naturopathy".
(4) "N.D.", "ND", "NMD", or "N.M.D.".
(5) "Naturopathic physician".
C. A person represents himself as a naturopathic doctor when he uses or
adopts any of the terms provided for in this Section or otherwise represents being
licensed in accordance with this Chapter.
Page 16 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1203 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1093
D. A person who is not licensed in accordance with this Chapter and who
uses the term "traditional naturopath" or "naturopath" in advertising, a business
name, a website, marketing materials, social media, client paperwork, or signage
shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the education level and credential basis
including the highest relevant degree or credential and the granting institution or
program type.
E. The disclosures required by Subsection D of this Section shall be clearly
visible in all of the following locations:
(1) On the person's website homepage or main page.
(2) On any business profile or main marketing website where the title is
used.
(3) On client intake or service description materials where the title is used.
(4) In print, digital, and social media advertising where the title is used.
F. A person described in Subsection E of this Section shall not use "doctor,"
"physician," "N.D.", "NMD," "N.M.D.", "Doctor of Naturopathic Medicine," or
similar terms implying licensure under this Chapter unless licensed.
G. The board shall adopt rules defining minimum formatting standards for
conspicuous disclosure.
§3744. Independent practice of naturopathic medicine
The practice of naturopathic medicine authorized by this Chapter does not
require physician oversight, supervisory agreements, or collaboration as a condition
of licensure or lawful practice.